Louisiana, session 2026, HB5.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:4(C)(17)(c), 1104(F), and 1104.3 are hereby enacted to read as
follows:
§4. Jurisdiction, duties, and powers of the secretary; rules and regulations
* * *
C. The secretary has authority to make, after notice and hearings as provided
in this Chapter, any reasonable rules, regulations, and orders that are necessary from
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-114 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 5
time to time in the proper administration and enforcement of this Chapter, including
rules, regulations, or orders for the following purposes:
* * *
(17)
* * *
(c) The secretary's authority pursuant to this Paragraph shall be subject to the
local option procedures set forth in Chapter 11 of this Subtitle.
* * *
§1104. Duties and powers of the secretary; rules and regulations; permits
* * *
F.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the secretary
shall not issue any order, permit, or certificate authorizing Class VI injection wells,
carbon dioxide sequestration, or pipelines transporting carbon dioxide in any parish
where prohibited pursuant to the local option procedure set forth in this Chapter.
(2) The prohibition contained in this Section shall prevent the final issuance
of any order, permit, or certificate, regardless of whether an application for the same
was previously submitted to the department.
* * *
§1104.3. Local option
A. A parish governing authority and the citizens of a parish may determine
whether Class VI injection wells, carbon dioxide sequestration, or pipelines
transporting carbon dioxide are permitted within a particular parish as provided in
this Section.
B.(1) A parish governing authority may, by resolution or ordinance,
determine whether or not Class VI injection wells, carbon dioxide sequestration, and
pipelines transporting carbon dioxide may be permitted within the parish.
(2) A copy of any resolution or ordinance passed for this purpose shall be
provided to the department by the governing authority.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-114 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 5
(3) Any prohibition passed by a governing authority pursuant to this
Subsection shall become effective upon its adoption by the parish governing
authority.
C. In addition to the procedure provided in Subsection B of this Section, a
parish-wide election may be held to determine whether or not Class VI injection
wells, carbon dioxide sequestration, or pipelines transporting carbon dioxide will be
allowed within that parish pursuant to the following procedures:
(1) A parish governing authority may call an election for this purpose upon
its own initiative and shall call an election for this purpose when requested to do so
by written petition signed by at least fifteen percent of the qualified electors of the
parish, as certified by the parish registrar of voters. Whether initiated by the parish
governing authority or by petition, the election shall be ordered by a resolution
adopted by the parish governing authority that states the purpose for which the
election is being called and the date the election is to be held.
(2) Any election called pursuant to this Section shall be held in accordance
with the provisions of the Louisiana Election Code governing proposition or question
elections.
(3)(a) If a majority of the electors voting in the election vote to allow Class
VI injection wells, carbon dioxide sequestration, or pipelines transporting carbon
dioxide, then such activity may be permitted within the parish as provided by law.
(b) If a majority of the electors voting in the election vote not to allow Class
VI injection wells, carbon dioxide sequestration, or pipelines transporting carbon
dioxide, then such activity shall be prohibited within the parish.
(4) The parish governing authority that ordered the election shall promulgate
the results of the election by resolution or ordinance adopted at its first regular
meeting after the election and shall notify the department of the results.
(5) Elections authorized by this Section shall not be held more than once in
a five-year period.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-114 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 5
(6) Any prohibition determined by an election pursuant to this Subsection
shall be effective upon certification of the election results by the parish registrar of
voters.
D. In the event that there are conflicting determinations made by a parish
governing authority adopting a resolution or ordinance pursuant to Subsection B of
this Section and the results of an election held pursuant to Subsection C of this
Section, the results of the election shall govern and may not be superseded by
subsequent action taken by the parish governing authority alone until the expiration
of five years from the date of the most recent election held for this purpose.
E. Any local determination made pursuant to this Section shall supersede and
preempt any conflicting state or local law, regulation, order, permit, or certificate.
No application, option agreement, site control agreement, or preliminary or draft
approval shall confer vested rights or grandfathered authority inconsistent with a
parish prohibition adopted pursuant to this Section.
Section 2. If any provision of this Act or the application thereof is held invalid, such
invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this Act which can be given
effect without the invalid provisions or applications, and to this end the provisions of this
Act are hereby declared severable.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.